Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.220

Strategic information technology plan—Biennial performance reports.

(1) The agency shall prepare a state strategic information technology plan which shall establish a statewide mission, goals, and objectives for the use of information technology, including goals for electronic access to government records, information, and services. The plan shall be developed in accordance with the standards and policies established by the agency. The agency shall seek the advice of the board in the development of this plan.

The plan shall be updated as necessary and submitted to the governor and the legislature.

(2) The agency shall prepare a biennial state performance report on information technology based on state agency performance reports required under RCW 43.105.235 and other information deemed appropriate by the agency. The report shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) An analysis, based upon agency portfolios, of the state's information technology infrastructure, including its value, condition, and capacity;

(b) An evaluation of performance relating to information technology;

(c) An assessment of progress made toward implementing the state strategic information technology plan, including progress toward electronic access to public information and enabling citizens to have two-way access to public records, information, and services; and

(d) An analysis of the success or failure, feasibility, progress, costs, and timeliness of implementation of major information technology projects under RCW 43.105.245. At a minimum, the portion of the report regarding major technology projects must include:

(i) The total cost data for the entire life-cycle of the project, including capital and operational costs, broken down by staffing costs, contracted service, hardware purchase or lease, software purchase or lease, travel, and training. The original budget must also be shown for comparison;

(ii) The original proposed project schedule and the final actual project schedule;

(iii) Data regarding progress towards meeting the original goals and performance measures of the project;

(iv) Discussion of lessons learned on the project, performance of any contractors used, and reasons for project delays or cost increases; and

(v) Identification of benefits generated by major information technology projects developed under RCW 43.105.245.

(3) Copies of the report shall be distributed biennially to the governor and the legislature. The major technology section of the report must examine major information technology projects completed in the previous biennium.

[ 2024 c 54 s 7; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 203; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 707. Formerly RCW 43.41A.030.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.